West Virginia, session 2026, HB5400.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8D. CHILD ABUSE. §61-8D-4a. Child neglect resulting in death; criminal penalties. (a) If any parent, guardian or custodian, or person in a position of trust in relation to a child shall neglect a child under his or her care, custody or control and by such neglect cause the death of said child, then such parent, guardian or custodian, or person in a position of trust in relation to a child shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 or committed to the custody of the Division of Corrections for not less than three nor more than 15 years, or both fined and imprisoned shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than 10 years nor more than 20 years.(b) No child who in lieu of medical treatment was under treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with a recognized method of religious healing with a reasonable proven record of success shall, for that reason alone, be considered to have been neglected within the provisions of this section. A method of religious healing shall be presumed to be a recognized method of religious healing if fees and expenses incurred in connection with the treatment are permitted to be deducted from taxable income as "medical expenses" pursuant to regulations or rules promulgated by the United States Internal Revenue Service: Provided, That the provisions of this subsection do not apply to a person in a position of trust in relation to a child who, by virtue of his or her occupation or position, is charged with any duty or responsibility for the health, education, welfare, or supervision of a child.(c) A child whose parent, guardian or legal custodian, or person in a position of trust in relation to that child has inhibited or interfered with the provision of medical treatment in accordance with a court order may be considered to have been neglected for the purposes of this section.